Hawaii statutes.
[§321C-7] Language access advisory council.
(a) There is established the language access advisory council, which shall be placed
within the department of health for administrative purposes only. The council
shall consist of the following members to be appointed by the governor:

(1) One representative from the state government;

(2) One representative from a covered entity;

(3) One bilingual worker who is or has been employed
by a state-funded immigrant service agency or program;

(4) One representative of an advocacy organization
that provides services to limited English proficient persons;

(5) One member from the limited English proficient
population who has an interest in the provision of oral language services;

(6) One representative from an accredited institution
of higher learning who provides professional training in interpretation and
translation;

(7) One representative of a Hawaiian language
advocacy organization;

(8) One representative of a professional
interpreter's organization;

(9) One representative of a bilingual referral
service or program;

(10) One representative residing in the county
of Hawaii who has shown interest in language access;

(11) One representative residing in the county
of Kauai who has shown interest in language access;

(12) One representative residing in the county
of Maui who has shown interest in language access;

(13) One representative residing in the city and
county of Honolulu who has shown interest in language access;

(14) One member-at-large;

(15) The executive director of the Hawaii civil rights
commission or authorized representative, as an ex officio member;

(16) One representative from the disability and
communication access board, as an ex officio member; and

(17) The executive director, as an ex officio member.

(b) Members shall be appointed in accordance
with section 26-34. The terms of the members shall be for four years. The council
shall select one of its members to serve as chair. No member of the council
shall receive any compensation for council services, but shall be allowed
necessary expenses for travel, board, and lodging incurred in the performance
of council duties.

(c) The language access advisory council shall
serve in an advisory capacity to the executive director, providing input on:

(1) Implementation and compliance with this chapter;

(2) The quality of oral and written language services
provided under this chapter; and

(3) The adequacy of a state agency or covered
entity's dissemination and training of its employees likely to have contact
with limited English proficient persons, its policies and procedures for
language services, its competency in working effectively with in-person and
telephone interpreters, and its understanding of the dynamics of interpretation
between clients, providers, and interpreters. [L 2012, c 201, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next